Washington statutes.
RCW 18.59.031

License required.

No person may practice or represent himself or herself as an occupational therapy practitioner without first having a valid license to do so.

[ 1999 c 333 s 2; 1987 c 150 s 44.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.